apertium-frp.frp.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 3
	Entries: 44160
	Sdefs: 77
	Paradigms: 374
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools format -alignMonodix new2.metadix new3.metadix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·∙ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäãçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzŀlłČŽčćšśžźőßœæŒ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="top" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="cog" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="postadv" 	c="-ce, -cé, -que, -qué, -lé"/> 
    <sdef n="pref" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="ord" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vaux" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="nom" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="ND" /> 
    <sdef n="ppres" /> 
    <sdef n="un" 	c="No gender"/> 
    <sdef n="org" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
<pardef n="III/o__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>émo</l>         <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>º</l>         <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>°</l>         <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éma</l>         <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ª</l>         <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>émos</l>        <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>os</l>        <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>émes</l>        <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[1-9][0-9]+</re><i></i><par n="III/o__adj"/></e>
<!--  <e>       <re>[0-9]([0-9]([0-9])?)?( [0-9][0-9][0-9])*</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e> -->
<!--  <e>       <re>[0-9]([0-9]([0-9])?)?( [0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e> -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="separa">
  <e r="LR"><re>[.\?;:!\|·]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/></l>      <r></r></p><re>[.\?;:!\|]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="separ">
  <e>       <re>¿</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[«\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[»\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="emails">
  <e>       <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="urls">
  <e>       <re>(((www.)|(http://|https://|ftp://))[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-]+([.][áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z]+)+(/[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9_]+)*([.][áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z]+)*)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="asian__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cllâr__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aventuriér__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="entiér__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="afriqu/en__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èna</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="use_sub"><p><l>êna</l><r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ènes</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="use_sub"><p><l>ênes</l><r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pl/en__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>êna</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ênes</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="parisi/en__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ena</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>èna</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enes</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ènes</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="blu">             <i>blu</i><par n="asian__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bouèmien">        <i>bouèmi</i><par n="afriqu/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cancaniér">       <i>cancaniér</i><par n="aventuriér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="charmaliér">      <i>charmaliér</i><par n="aventuriér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cllâr">           <i>cllâr</i><par n="cllâr__adj"/></e>
<e lm="coloniâl">        <i>coloniâl</i><par n="asian__adj"/></e>
<e lm="colègien">        <i>colègi</i><par n="afriqu/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="drapiér">         <i>drapiér</i><par n="aventuriér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dru">             <i>dru</i><par n="asian__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dèfêt">           <i>dèfêt</i><par n="entiér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="entiér">          <i>entiér</i><par n="entiér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="entèlèctuèlament" a="LoTrèsor"><i>entèlèctuèlament</i><par n="asian__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forètiér">        <i>forètiér</i><par n="aventuriér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="frêd">            <i>frêd</i><par n="entiér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fèacien">         <i>fèaci</i><par n="afriqu/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gnognon">         <i>gnognon</i><par n="asian__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gôchiér">         <i>gôchiér</i><par n="aventuriér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="israèlien">       <i>israèli</i><par n="afriqu/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="IX">              <i>IX</i><par n="III/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="legiér">          <i>legiér</i><par n="aventuriér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="macèdonien">      <i>macèdoni</i><par n="afriqu/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mafiét">          <i>mafiét</i><par n="asian__adj"/></e>
<e lm="major" c="Stich 01.06.20"><i>major</i><par n="entiér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="minor" c="Stich 01.06.20"><i>minor</i><par n="entiér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mobiliér">        <i>mobiliér</i><par n="aventuriér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mâltru">          <i>mâltru</i><par n="asian__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mèlyor" c="Stich 01.06.20"><i>mèlyor</i><par n="entiér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nicaragoayen">    <i>nicaragoay</i><par n="afriqu/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nêr">             <i>nêr</i><par n="entiér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="parisien">        <i>parisi</i><par n="parisi/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="parvegnu">        <i>parvegnu</i><par n="asian__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pir">             <i>pir</i><par n="aventuriér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="plen">            <i>pl</i><par n="pl/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="puant">           <i>puant</i><par n="asian__adj"/></e>
<e lm="relogiér">        <i>relogiér</i><par n="aventuriér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="riveren">         <i>river</i><par n="afriqu/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="râr">             <i>râr</i><par n="cllâr__adj"/></e>
<e lm="réstant">         <i>réstant</i><par n="asian__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sant">            <i>sant</i><par n="cllâr__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sent">            <i>sent</i><par n="cllâr__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sud-amèriquen">   <i>sud-amèriqu</i><par n="afriqu/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sèculiér">        <i>sèculiér</i><par n="aventuriér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sûr">             <i>sûr</i><par n="cllâr__adj"/></e>
<e lm="VI">              <i>VI</i><par n="III/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="VIII">            <i>VIII</i><par n="III/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vilen">           <i>vil</i><par n="afriqu/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vèrmèly">         <i>vèrmèly</i><par n="entiér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XI">              <i>XI</i><par n="III/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XIII">            <i>XIII</i><par n="III/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XIX">             <i>XIX</i><par n="III/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XVIII">           <i>XVIII</i><par n="III/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XXIII">           <i>XXIII</i><par n="III/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XXVI">            <i>XXVI</i><par n="III/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ètabli">          <i>ètabli</i><par n="asian__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ètrangiér">       <i>ètrangiér</i><par n="aventuriér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ètrêt">           <i>ètrêt</i><par n="entiér__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ôstralien">       <i>ôstrali</i><par n="afriqu/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="3o">              <i>3</i><par n="III/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="7o">              <i>7</i><par n="III/o__adj"/></e>
<e lm="saducèen" a="stich">          <i>saducè</i><par n="afriqu/en__adj"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="emails"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separ"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="urls"/></e>
